Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 4. Tenant Obligations.

Sec. 34.03.120.
Tenant obligations.

The tenant

shall keep that part of the premises occupied and used by the tenant as clean and safe as the condition of the premises permit;

shall dispose all ashes, rubbish, garbage, and other waste from the dwelling unit in a clean and safe manner;

shall keep all plumbing fixtures in the dwelling unit or used by the tenant as clean as their condition permits;

shall use in a reasonable manner all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, kitchen, and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, in the premises;

may not deliberately or negligently destroy, deface, damage, impair, or remove a part of the premises or knowingly permit any person to do so;

may not unreasonably disturb, or permit others on the premises with the tenant’s consent to unreasonably disturb, a neighbor’s peaceful enjoyment of the premises;

shall maintain smoke detection devices and carbon monoxide detection devices as required under AS

18.70.095

;

may not, except in an emergency when the landlord cannot be contacted after reasonable effort to do so, change the locks on doors of the premises without first securing the written agreement of the landlord and, immediately after changing the locks, providing the landlord a set of keys to all doors for which locks have been changed; in an emergency, the tenant may change the locks and shall, within five days, provide the landlord a set of keys to all doors for which locks have been changed and written notice of the change;

may not unreasonably engage in conduct, or permit others on the premises to engage in conduct, that results in the imposition of a fee under a municipal ordinance adopted under AS

29.35.125

; and

may not allow the number of individuals occupying the premises to exceed the number allowed by applicable law, by a covenant limiting the landlord’s use of the premises, or the rental agreement.

The tenant may not knowingly engage at the premises in prostitution, an illegal activity involving a place of prostitution, an illegal activity involving alcoholic beverages, an illegal activity involving gambling or promoting gambling, an illegal activity involving a controlled substance, or an illegal activity involving an imitation controlled substance, or knowingly permit others in the premises to engage in one or more of those activities at the rental premises.

When terminating the tenancy, the tenant shall leave the premises in substantially the same condition, except for normal wear and tear, as the condition of the premises at the beginning of the tenancy, including, in the landlord’s discretion, professionally cleaning the carpets if the carpets were professionally cleaned immediately before the tenancy began. In this subsection, “normal wear and tear” has the meaning given in AS

34.03.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 129 SLA 1988; am §§ 20, 21 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 111 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 60 SLA 2004; am §§ 9, 10 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For tenant’s duties related to smoke and carbon monoxide detectors, see AS

18.70.095

.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the 2014 changes to (a) of this section made in that act, and subsection (c), added by the act, “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.130.
Rules and regulations.

A landlord may adopt rules and regulations, which shall be posted prominently on the premises, concerning the tenant’s use and occupancy of the premises. A rule or regulation is enforceable against the tenant only if

its purpose is to promote the convenience, safety, health, or welfare of the tenants in the premises, preserve the landlord’s property from abusive use, or make a fair distribution of services and facilities held out for the tenants generally;

it is reasonably related to the purpose for which it is adopted;

it applies to all tenants in the premises in a fair manner;

it is sufficiently explicit in its prohibition, direction, or limitation of the tenant’s conduct to fairly inform the tenant of what the tenant must or must not do to comply;

it is not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord; and

the tenant has notice of it at the time the tenant enters into the rental agreement.

A rule or regulation adopted after the tenant enters into the rental agreement is enforceable against the tenant if reasonable notice of its adoption is given to the tenant and it does not work a substantial modification of the rental agreement.

A mobile home park operator may determine by rule or regulation the style or quality of the equipment, including but not limited to underskirting and tie-downs, to be purchased by the tenant from the vendor of the tenant’s choice; however, the operator may not require that the equipment be purchased from the operator.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 138 SLA 1976)

Sec. 34.03.140.
Access.

The tenant may not unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, remove personal property belonging to the landlord that is not covered by a written rental agreement, or exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants, workers, or contractors.

The landlord may enter the dwelling unit without the consent of the tenant in the case of emergency.

A landlord may not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the tenant. Except in case of emergency or if it is impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least 24 hours notice of intention to enter and may enter only at reasonable times and with the tenant’s consent.

The landlord does not have a right of access to the dwelling unit

except

as permitted by this section;

by court order; or

as permitted by AS

34.03.230(b)

; or

unless the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 22, 23 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.150.
Tenant to use and occupy.

Unless otherwise agreed, the tenant shall occupy the dwelling unit only as a dwelling unit.
The rental agreement shall require that the tenant notify the landlord of an anticipated extended absence from the premises in excess of seven days; however, the notice shall be given as soon as reasonably possible after the tenant knows the absence will exceed seven days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)